Mississippi statutes. Title 31. Public Business, Bonds and Obligations
State Bond Retirement Commission

§ 31-17-11.
Composition of state bond retirement commission.

There is hereby created the state bond retirement commission which shall be composed of the Governor, the Attorney General, and the State Treasurer. The Governor shall be the chairman of the commission, and the Attorney General shall be the secretary thereof.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1944, ch. 140, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 4, 1944).

§ 31-17-13.
General duties of state bond retirement commission.

It shall be the duty of the state bond retirement commission to administer the state bond retirement revolving fund provided for in Section 31-17-27, and to perform such other duties as may be prescribed in Sections 31-17-27 through 31-17-43.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1944, ch. 140, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Feb. 4, 1944).